District of Columbia statutes.
4-603

Set-off.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, whenever the District is a defendant in a proceeding brought by a beneficiary, it shall have a right to set off from a judgment against it any damages that represent compensation for the care and treatment it has undertaken to provide or pay for as health-care assistance.

(b)

No set-off shall be allowed from a judgment entered against the District pursuant to any provision of Chapter 13 of Title 7.

June 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-86, § 4, 31 DCR 2098
Mentally retarded persons, action to compel rights, initiation, see § 7-1305.13.
Mentally retarded persons, commitment and maintenance of substantially retarded persons, liability of estate of public patient for maintenance, see § 21-1110.
Mentally retarded persons, deprivation of civil rights, see § 7-1305.14.
1981 Ed., § 3-503.